pl: Wyposażenie kręgli dla dzieci w zestawie: Kula do kręgli; Tor/mata do kręgli; Kręgle; Torba transportowa/pokrowiec; Instrukcja/zasady gry; Układacz kręgli; Karty wyników; Tablica wyników; Naklejki/kalkomanie; Inne
pt-PT: Equipamento de bowling de brinquedo incluído: Bola de bowling; Pista/tapete de bowling; Pinos de bowling; Saco de transporte/caixa de arrumação; Instruções/livro de regras; Reposicionador de pinos; Cartões de pontuação; Marcador; Autocolantes/decalques; Outro
hr-HR: Uključena oprema za kuglanje s igračkom: Kugla za kuglanje; Staza / podloga za kuglanje; Čunjevi za kuglanje; Torba za nošenje / kutija za pohranu; Upute / knjižica s pravilima; Uređaj za postavljanje čunjeva; Kartice za bodovanje; Ploča s rezultatima; Naljepnice/preslikači; Ostalo
ro-RO: Echipament de bowling de jucărie inclus: Bilă de bowling; Pistă/covoraș de bowling; Popice de bowling; Geantă de transport/casetă de depozitare; Instrucțiuni/broșură cu reguli; Sistem de așezare a popicelor; Fișe de scor; Tabelă de marcaj; Autocolante/abtibilduri; Altele
de: Enthaltene Spielzeug-Bowlingausrüstung: Bowlingkugel; Bowlingbahn/-matte; Bowlingpins; Tragetasche/Aufbewahrungskoffer; Anleitung/Regelheft; Pin-Aufsteller; Punktekarten; Anzeigetafel; Aufkleber/Decals; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Включени елементи към играчката за боулинг: Топка за боулинг; Боулинг пътека/постелка; Кегли за боулинг; Чанта за носене/кутия за съхранение; Инструкции/правила за игра; Механизъм за пренареждане на кегли; Карти за резултати; Табло за резултати; Стикери/ваденки; Друго
es: Equipo de bowling de juguete incluido: Bola de bolos; Pista/tapete de bolos; Bolos; Bolsa de transporte/estuche de almacenamiento; Instrucciones/folleto de reglas; Colocador de bolos; Tarjetas de puntuación; Marcador; Pegatinas/calcomanías; Otro
en: Toy bowling equipment included: Bowling ball; Bowling lane/mat; Bowling pins; Carrying bag/storage case; Instructions/rule booklet; Pin resetter; Score cards; Scoreboard; Stickers/decals; Other
sl-SI: Vključena oprema za otroško kegljanje: Krogla; Steza/podloga za bovling; Keglji; Nosilna torba/kovček za shranjevanje; Navodila/knjižica s pravili; Naprava za postavitev kegljev; Točkovni kartončki; Semafor; Nalepke; Drugo
fr: Équipement inclus avec le jeu de quilles jouet: Boule de bowling; Piste/tapis de bowling; Quilles de bowling; Sac de transport/étui de rangement; Instructions/livret de règles; Replaceur de quilles; Fiches de score; Tableau des scores; Autocollants/décalcomanies; Autre
fi: Sisältyvät lelukeilailuvälineet: Keilapallo; Keilarata/-matto; Keilat; Kantokassi/säilytyskotelo; Ohjeet/sääntökirja; Keilojen nostaja; Pistoskortit / tuloskortit; Tulostaulu; Tarrat/siirtokuvat; Muu
hu: Játékbowling mellékelt tartozékai: Bowlinggolyó; Bowlingpálya/szőnyeg; Bowlingbábuk; Hordtáska/tároló; Játékszabály/útmutató; Bábuállító; Pontozókártyák; Eredményjelző; Matricák; Egyéb
ko: 장난감 볼링 세트 구성품: 볼링공; 볼링 레인/매트; 볼링 핀; 휴대용 가방/보관 케이스; 설명서/규칙 안내서; 핀 리세터; 점수 카드; 점수판; 스티커/데칼; 기타
tr: Dahil olan oyuncak bowling ekipmanları: Bovling topu; Bovling kulvarı/matı; Bovling lobutları; Taşıma/saklama çantası; Talimatlar/kural kitapçığı; Lobut dizici; Skor kartları; Skor tablosu; Çıkartmalar/dekaller; Diğer
sv: Leksaksutrustning för bowling ingår: Bowlingklot; Bowlingbana/-matta; Bowlingkäglor; Bärväska/förvaringslåda; Instruktioner/regelhäfte; Kägelresare; Poängkort; Poängtavla; Klistermärken/dekaler; Övrigt
zh-TW: 包含玩具保齡球裝備: 保齡球; 保齡球道/墊子; 保齡球瓶; 提袋/收納盒; 說明書/規則手冊; 排球機; 記分卡; 計分板; 貼紙/轉印貼紙; 其他
ru: Комплект игрушечного боулинга: Шар для боулинга; Дорожка/коврик для боулинга; Кегли для боулинга; Сумка/чехол для хранения; Инструкция/буклет с правилами; Устройство для установки кеглей; Карточки для счета; Табло; Наклейки/декали; Другое
ja: おもちゃのボウリング用具同梱品: ボーリングボール; ボーリングレーン / マット; ボーリングピン; キャリーバッグ / 収納ケース; 取扱説明書 / ルールブック; ピンリセッター; スコアカード; スコアボード; ステッカー / デカール; その他
da: Medfølgende legetøjsbowlingudstyr: Bowlingkugle; Bowlingbane/-måtte; Kegler; Bæretaske/opbevaringskasse; Vejledning/regelbog; Keglerejser; Pointkort; Pointtavle; Klistermærker/mærkater; Andet
cs: Obsažené vybavení na dětský bowling: Bowlingová koule; Bowlingová dráha / podložka; Kuželky; Přenosná taška / úložné pouzdro; Návod / pravidla; Stavěč kuželek; Bodovací karty; Výsledková tabule; Samolepky/obtisky; Jiné
it: Attrezzatura da bowling giocattolo inclusa: Palla da bowling; Pista/tappeto da bowling; Birilli; Borsa per il trasporto/custodia; Istruzioni/libretto delle regole; Riposizionatore di birilli; Schede segnapunti; Tabellone segnapunti; Adesivi/decalcomanie; Altro
lt-LT: Įtraukta žaislinio boulingo įranga: Boulingo kamuolys; Boulingo takelis / kilimėlis; Boulingo kėgliai; Krepšys / laikymo dėklas; Instrukcijos / taisyklių knygelė; Kėglių atstatymo mechanizmas; Rezultatų kortelės; Rezultatų lenta; Lipdukai / dekoracijos; Kita
nb: Lekebowlingutstyr inkludert: Bowlingkule; Bowlingbane/-matte; Bowlingkjegler; Bæreveske/oppbevaringsboks; Instruksjoner/regelbok; Kjegleoppsetter; Poengkort; Poengtavle; Klistremerker/dekaler; Annet
th: รวมอุปกรณ์โบว์ลิ่งของเล่น: ลูกโบว์ลิ่ง; เลน/เสื่อโบว์ลิ่ง; พินโบว์ลิ่ง; กระเป๋าพกพา/กล่องเก็บ; คู่มือ/หนังสือกฎกติกา; ตัวตั้งพิน; บัตรบันทึกคะแนน; กระดานคะแนน; สติกเกอร์/รูปลอก; อื่นๆ
vi: Bao gồm dụng cụ chơi bowling đồ chơi.: Quả bóng bowling; Đường băng/thảm bowling; Ky bowling; Túi/hộp đựng; Hướng dẫn/sổ tay luật chơi; Dụng cụ xếp ky; Thẻ ghi điểm; Bảng điểm; Nhãn dán/đề can; Khác
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia je aj vybavenie na bowling: Bowlingová guľa; Bowlingová dráha/podložka; Bowlingové kolky; Prenosná taška/úložné puzdro; Návod/knižka s pravidlami; Stavač kolkov; Výsledkové karty; Výsledková tabuľa; Nálepky/obtlačky; Iné
nl: Meegeleverde speelgoedbowlinguitrusting: Bowlingbal; Bowlingbaan/-mat; Bowlingkegels; Draagtas/opbergkoffer; Instructies/spelregelboekje; Kegelzetter; Scorekaarten; Scorebord; Stickers/decals; Overig
pt-BR: Boliche de brinquedo equipamento incluído: Bola de boliche; Pista/tapete de boliche; Pinos de boliche; Bolsa de transporte/estojo de armazenamento; Instruções/livreto de regras; Reposicionador de pinos; Cartões de pontuação; Placar; Adesivos/decalques; Outros
el: Περιλαμβανόμενος εξοπλισμός παιχνιδιού μπόουλινγκ: Μπάλα μπόουλινγκ; Διάδρομος/Χαλάκι μπόουλινγκ; Κορύνες μπόουλινγκ; Τσάντα μεταφοράς/θήκη αποθήκευσης; Οδηγίες/βιβλιαράκι κανόνων; Μηχανισμός επαναφοράς κορυνών; Κάρτες βαθμολογίας; Πίνακας βαθμολογίας; Αυτοκόλλητα/χαλκομανίες; Άλλο
zh-CN: 包含玩具保龄球器材: 保龄球; 保龄球道/垫; 保龄球瓶; 便携袋/收纳盒; 说明书/规则手册; 摆瓶器; 记分卡; 记分板; 贴纸/贴花; 其他